District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.02

Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of the District in a proceeding under this chapter or other law of the District relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of the District has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by §§ 46-352.05, 46-352.06, and 46-352.11.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 202, 63 DCR 222